Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1247
Taxation of air carriers; annual report; contents; failure to furnish report or information; penalty; waiver.

(1) Each air carrier, as defined in section 77-1244, shall on or before June 1 in each year make to the Property Tax Administrator a report, in such form as may be prescribed by the Tax Commissioner, containing the information necessary to determine the value of its flight equipment and the proportion allocated to this state for purposes of taxation as provided in section 77-1246. For good cause shown, the Property Tax Administrator may allow an extension of time in which to file such report. Such extension shall not exceed thirty days after June 1.

(2) For each day's failure to furnish the report required by subsection (1) of this section or for each day's failure to furnish the information as required on the report, the air carrier may be assessed a penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars, except that the penalty shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. Such penalty shall be collected by the Tax Commissioner and credited to the Department of Revenue Property Assessment Division Cash Fund. The Tax Commissioner, in his or her discretion, may waive all or part of the penalty provided in this section.

Laws 1949, c. 231, § 1, p. 641;

Laws 1965, c. 478, § 11, p. 1544;

Laws 1986, LB 817, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 100;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 59;

Laws 1999, LB 36, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 54.

Each affected carrier is required to make report. Mid-Continent Airlines v. Nebraska State Board of Equalization, 105 F.Supp. 188 (D. Neb. 1952).